Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-316
Suspension of service; approval of commission; voluntary revocation of certificate or permit.

Except for circumstances beyond the control of the regulated motor carrier, such as strikes against such carrier, acts of God, and the common enemy, service under a certificate of public convenience and necessity or a permit shall not be suspended without first obtaining approval of the commission. Nothing in sections 75-101 to 75-801 shall prevent the holder of a certificate or permit from requesting revocation of such certificate or permit as provided for in section 75-315.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. III, § 16, p. 1383;

Laws 1995, LB 424, § 41.